Missouri, session 2026, SB1522.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 137.115, 138.060, 138.135, 138.434,
and 139.031, RSMo, are repealed and six new sections enacted in
lieu thereof, to be known as sections 137.115, 137.132, 138.060,
138.135, 138.434, and 139.031, to read as follows:
137.115. 1. All other laws to the contrary
notwithstanding, the assessor or the assessor's deputies in
all counties of this state including the City of St. Louis
shall annually make a list of all real and tangible personal
property taxable in the assessor's city, county, town or
district. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of
this section and section 137.078, the assessor shall
annually assess all personal property at thirty-three and
one-third percent of its true value in money as of January
first of each calendar year. The assessor shall annually
assess all real property, including any new construction and
improvements to real property, and possessory interests in
real property at the percent of its true value in money set
in subsection 5 of this section. The true value in money of
any possessory interest in real property in subclass (3),
where such real property is on or lies within the ultimate
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1522 2
airport boundary as shown by a federal airport layout plan,
as defined by 14 CFR 151.5, of a commercial airport having a
FAR Part 139 certification and owned by a political
subdivision, shall be the otherwise applicable true value in
money of any such possessory interest in real property, less
the total dollar amount of costs paid by a party, other than
the political subdivision, towards any new construction or
improvements on such real property completed after January
1, 2008, and which are included in the above-mentioned
possessory interest, regardless of the year in which such
costs were incurred or whether such costs were considered in
any prior year. The assessor shall annually assess all real
property in the following manner: new assessed values shall
be determined as of January first of each odd-numbered year
and shall be entered in the assessor's books; those same
assessed values shall apply in the following even-numbered
year, except for new construction and property improvements
which shall be valued as though they had been completed as
of January first of the preceding odd-numbered year. The
assessor may call at the office, place of doing business, or
residence of each person required by this chapter to list
property, and require the person to make a correct statement
of all taxable tangible personal property owned by the
person or under his or her care, charge or management,
taxable in the county. On or before January first of each
even-numbered year, the assessor shall prepare and submit a
two-year assessment maintenance plan to the county governing
body and the state tax commission for their respective
approval or modification. The county governing body shall
approve and forward such plan or its alternative to the plan
to the state tax commission by February first. If the
county governing body fails to forward the plan or its

SB 1522 3
alternative to the plan to the state tax commission by
February first, the assessor's plan shall be considered
approved by the county governing body. If the state tax
commission fails to approve a plan and if the state tax
commission and the assessor and the governing body of the
county involved are unable to resolve the differences, in
order to receive state cost-share funds outlined in section
137.750, the county or the assessor shall petition the
administrative hearing commission, by May first, to decide
all matters in dispute regarding the assessment maintenance
plan. Upon agreement of the parties, the matter may be
stayed while the parties proceed with mediation or
arbitration upon terms agreed to by the parties. The final
decision of the administrative hearing commission shall be
subject to judicial review in the circuit court of the
county involved. In the event a valuation of subclass (1)
real property within any county with a charter form of
government, or within a city not within a county, is made by
a computer, computer-assisted method or a computer program,
the burden of proof, supported by clear, convincing and
cogent evidence to sustain such valuation, shall be on the
assessor at any hearing or appeal. In any such county,
unless the assessor proves otherwise, there shall be a
presumption that the assessment was made by a computer,
computer-assisted method or a computer program. Such
evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, the
following:
(1) The findings of the assessor based on an appraisal
of the property by generally accepted appraisal techniques;
and
(2) The purchase prices from sales of at least three
comparable properties and the address or location thereof.

SB 1522 4
As used in this subdivision, the word "comparable" means
that:
(a) Such sale was closed at a date relevant to the
property valuation; and
(b) Such properties are not more than one mile from
the site of the disputed property, except where no similar
properties exist within one mile of the disputed property,
the nearest comparable property shall be used. Such
property shall be within five hundred square feet in size of
the disputed property, and resemble the disputed property in
age, floor plan, number of rooms, and other relevant
characteristics.
2. Assessors in each county of this state and the City
of St. Louis may send personal property assessment forms
through the mail.
3. The following items of personal property shall each
constitute separate subclasses of tangible personal property
and shall be assessed and valued for the purposes of
taxation at the following percentages of their true value in
100 money:
101 (1) Grain and other agricultural crops in an
102 unmanufactured condition, one-half of one percent;
103 (2) Livestock, twelve percent;
104 (3) Farm machinery, twelve percent;
105 (4) Motor vehicles which are eligible for registration
106 as and are registered as historic motor vehicles pursuant to
107 section 301.131 and aircraft which are at least twenty-five
108 years old and which are used solely for noncommercial
109 purposes and are operated less than two hundred hours per
110 year or aircraft that are home built from a kit, five
111 percent;
112 (5) Poultry, twelve percent;

SB 1522 5
113 (6) Tools and equipment used for pollution control and
114 tools and equipment used in retooling for the purpose of
115 introducing new product lines or used for making
116 improvements to existing products by any company which is
117 located in a state enterprise zone and which is identified
118 by any standard industrial classification number cited in
119 subdivision (7) of section 135.200, twenty-five percent; and
120 (7) Solar panels, racking systems, inverters, and
121 related solar equipment, components, materials, and supplies
122 installed in connection with solar photovoltaic energy
123 systems, as described in subdivision (46) of subsection 2 of
124 section 144.030, that were constructed and producing solar
125 energy prior to August 9, 2022, five percent.
126 4. The person listing the property shall enter a true
127 and correct statement of the property, in a printed blank
128 prepared for that purpose. The statement, after being
129 filled out, shall be signed and either affirmed or sworn to
130 as provided in section 137.155. The list shall then be
131 delivered to the assessor.
132 5. (1) All subclasses of real property, as such
133 subclasses are established in Section 4(b) of Article X of
134 the Missouri Constitution and defined in section 137.016,
135 shall be assessed at the following percentages of true value:
136 (a) For real property in subclass (1), nineteen
137 percent;
138 (b) For real property in subclass (2), twelve percent;
139 and
140 (c) For real property in subclass (3), thirty-two
141 percent.
142 (2) A taxpayer may apply to the county assessor, or,
143 if not located within a county, then the assessor of such
144 city, for the reclassification of such taxpayer's real

SB 1522 6
145 property if the use or purpose of such real property is
146 changed after such property is assessed under the provisions
147 of this chapter. If the assessor determines that such
148 property shall be reclassified, he or she shall determine
149 the assessment under this subsection based on the percentage
150 of the tax year that such property was classified in each
151 subclassification.
152 6. Manufactured homes, as defined in section 700.010,
153 which are actually used as dwelling units shall be assessed
154 at the same percentage of true value as residential real
155 property for the purpose of taxation. The percentage of
156 assessment of true value for such manufactured homes shall
157 be the same as for residential real property. If the county
158 collector cannot identify or find the manufactured home when
159 attempting to attach the manufactured home for payment of
160 taxes owed by the manufactured home owner, the county
161 collector may request the county commission to have the
162 manufactured home removed from the tax books, and such
163 request shall be granted within thirty days after the
164 request is made; however, the removal from the tax books
165 does not remove the tax lien on the manufactured home if it
166 is later identified or found. For purposes of this section,
167 a manufactured home located in a manufactured home rental
168 park, rental community or on real estate not owned by the
169 manufactured home owner shall be considered personal
170 property. For purposes of this section, a manufactured home
171 located on real estate owned by the manufactured home owner
172 may be considered real property.
173 7. Each manufactured home assessed shall be considered
174 a parcel for the purpose of reimbursement pursuant to
175 section 137.750, unless the manufactured home is deemed to
176 be real estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015

SB 1522 7
177 and assessed as a realty improvement to the existing real
178 estate parcel.
179 8. Any amount of tax due and owing based on the
180 assessment of a manufactured home shall be included on the
181 personal property tax statement of the manufactured home
182 owner unless the manufactured home is deemed to be real
183 estate as defined in subsection 7 of section 442.015, in
184 which case the amount of tax due and owing on the assessment
185 of the manufactured home as a realty improvement to the
186 existing real estate parcel shall be included on the real
187 property tax statement of the real estate owner.
188 9. The assessor of each county and each city not
189 within a county shall use a nationally recognized automotive
190 trade publication such as the National Automobile Dealers'
191 Association Official Used Car Guide, Kelley Blue Book,
192 Edmunds, or other similar publication as the recommended
193 guide of information for determining the true value of motor
194 vehicles described in such publication. The state tax
195 commission shall select and make available to all assessors
196 which publication shall be used. The assessor of each
197 county and each city not within a county shall use the trade-
198 in value published in the current October issue of the
199 publication selected by the state tax commission. The
200 assessor shall not use a value that is greater than the
201 average trade-in value in determining the true value of the
202 motor vehicle without performing a physical inspection of
203 the motor vehicle. For vehicles two years old or newer from
204 a vehicle's model year, the assessor may use a value other
205 than average without performing a physical inspection of the
206 motor vehicle. In the absence of a listing for a particular
207 motor vehicle in such publication, the assessor shall use
208 such information or publications that, in the assessor's

SB 1522 8
209 judgment, will fairly estimate the true value in money of
210 the motor vehicle. For motor vehicles with a true value of
211 less than fifty thousand dollars as of January 1, 2025, the
212 assessor shall not assess such motor vehicle for an amount
213 greater than such motor vehicle was assessed in the previous
214 year, provided that such motor vehicle was properly assessed
215 in the previous year.
216 10. Before the assessor may increase the assessed
217 valuation of any parcel of subclass (1) real property by
218 more than fifteen percent since the last assessment,
219 excluding increases due to new construction or improvements,
220 the assessor shall conduct a physical inspection of such
221 property.
222 11. If a physical inspection is required[,] pursuant
223 to subsection 10 of this section, the assessor shall notify
224 the property owner of that fact in writing and shall provide
225 the owner clear written notice of the owner's rights
226 relating to the physical inspection. If a physical
227 inspection is required, the property owner may request that
228 an interior inspection be performed during the physical
229 inspection. The owner shall have no less than thirty days
230 prior to the physical inspection to notify the assessor of a
231 request for an interior physical inspection.
232 12. A physical inspection[, as] required by subsection
233 10 of this section[,] shall be completed prior to July first
234 of the reassessment year and shall include, but not be
235 limited to, an on-site personal observation and review of
236 all exterior portions of the land and any buildings and
237 improvements to which the inspector has or may reasonably
238 and lawfully gain external access, and shall include an
239 observation and review of the interior of any buildings or
240 improvements on the property upon the timely request of the

SB 1522 9
241 owner pursuant to subsection 11 of this section. Mere
242 observation of the property via a drive-by inspection or the
243 like shall not be considered sufficient to constitute a
244 physical inspection as required by this section.
245 13. A county or city collector may accept credit cards
246 as proper form of payment of outstanding property tax or
247 license due. No county or city collector may charge
248 surcharge for payment by credit card which exceeds the fee
249 or surcharge charged by the credit card bank, processor, or
250 issuer for its service. A county or city collector may
251 accept payment by electronic transfers of funds in payment
252 of any tax or license and charge the person making such
253 payment a fee equal to the fee charged the county by the
254 bank, processor, or issuer of such electronic payment.
255 14. Any county or city not within a county in this
256 state may, by an affirmative vote of the governing body of
257 such county, opt out of the provisions of this section and
258 sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as enacted by house
259 bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general assembly, second
260 regular session and section 137.073 as modified by house
261 committee substitute for senate substitute for senate
262 committee substitute for senate bill no. 960, ninety-second
263 general assembly, second regular session, for the next year
264 of the general reassessment, prior to January first of any
265 year. No county or city not within a county shall exercise
266 this opt-out provision after implementing the provisions of
267 this section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
268 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
269 assembly, second regular session and section 137.073 as
270 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
271 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
272 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, in a

SB 1522 10
273 year of general reassessment. For the purposes of applying
274 the provisions of this subsection, a political subdivision
275 contained within two or more counties where at least one of
276 such counties has opted out and at least one of such
277 counties has not opted out shall calculate a single tax rate
278 as in effect prior to the enactment of house bill no. 1150
279 of the ninety-first general assembly, second regular
280 session. A governing body of a city not within a county or
281 a county that has opted out under the provisions of this
282 subsection may choose to implement the provisions of this
283 section and sections 137.073, 138.060, and 138.100 as
284 enacted by house bill no. 1150 of the ninety-first general
285 assembly, second regular session, and section 137.073 as
286 modified by house committee substitute for senate substitute
287 for senate committee substitute for senate bill no. 960,
288 ninety-second general assembly, second regular session, for
289 the next year of general reassessment, by an affirmative
290 vote of the governing body prior to December thirty-first of
291 any year.
292 15. The governing body of any city of the third
293 classification with more than twenty-six thousand three
294 hundred but fewer than twenty-six thousand seven hundred
295 inhabitants located in any county that has exercised its
296 authority to opt out under subsection 14 of this section may
297 levy separate and differing tax rates for real and personal
298 property only if such city bills and collects its own
299 property taxes or satisfies the entire cost of the billing
300 and collection of such separate and differing tax rates.
301 Such separate and differing rates shall not exceed such
302 city's tax rate ceiling.
303 16. Any portion of real property that is available as
304 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for

SB 1522 11
305 purposes of excavation for future use or sale to others that
306 has not been bonded and permitted under chapter 444 shall be
307 assessed based upon how the real property is currently being
308 used. Any information provided to a county assessor, state
309 tax commission, state agency, or political subdivision
310 responsible for the administration of tax policies shall, in
311 the performance of its duties, make available all books,
312 records, and information requested, except such books,
313 records, and information as are by law declared confidential
314 in nature, including individually identifiable information
315 regarding a specific taxpayer or taxpayer's mine property.
316 For purposes of this subsection, "mine property" shall mean
317 all real property that is in use or readily available as a
318 reserve for strip, surface, or coal mining for minerals for
319 purposes of excavation for current or future use or sale to
320 others that has been bonded and permitted under chapter 444.
137.132. 1. For the purposes of this section, and in
any appeal alleging a violation thereof, the following terms
shall mean:
(1) "Common level of assessment", the ratio of the
total of the assessor's assessed values for all real
property in a subclass, as verified pursuant to section
137.245, to the total of actual true values in money of the
same real property, expressed as a percentage, and measured
by an assessment ratio study;
(2) "Individual level of assessment", the ratio of an
assessor's assessed value for an individual parcel of real
property, as verified pursuant to section 137.245, to the
actual true value in money of such real property, expressed
as a percentage.
2. The level of assessment of all real property in
subclass (1) or subclass (3), as provided in section

SB 1522 12
137.115, shall be uniform and equal throughout each
subclass. If the common level of assessment in either
subclass is lower than the individual level of assessment of
any parcel in the same subclass, the individual level of
assessment of such parcel shall be lowered to the common
level of assessment for the subclass upon appeal by the
property owner to the local board of equalization, state tax
commission, or circuit court.
3. When determining the individual level of assessment
of a parcel of real property, the lesser of the assessor's
appraised value, as verified pursuant to section 137.245, or
the appraised value set by the local board of equalization
shall be presumed to be the actual true value in money for
such real property, absent substantial and persuasive
evidence establishing a lower true value in money.
138.060. 1. The county board of equalization shall,
in a summary way, determine all appeals from the valuation
of property made by the assessor, and shall correct and
adjust the assessment accordingly. There shall be no
presumption that the assessor's valuation is correct. In
any county with a charter form of government with a
population greater than two hundred eighty thousand
inhabitants but less than two hundred eighty-five thousand
inhabitants, in any county with a charter form of government
with greater than one million inhabitants, in any city not
within a county, and in any other county for any property
whose assessed valuation increased at least fifteen percent
from the previous assessment unless the increase is due to
new construction or improvement, the assessor shall have the
burden to prove that the assessor's valuation does not
exceed the true market value of the subject property. In
such county or city, in the event a physical inspection of

SB 1522 13
the subject property is required by subsection 10 of section
137.115, the assessor shall have the burden to establish the
manner in which the physical inspection was performed and
shall have the burden to prove that the physical inspection
was performed in accordance with section 137.115. In such
county or city, in the event the assessor fails to provide
sufficient evidence to establish that the physical
inspection was performed in accordance with section 137.115,
the property owner shall prevail on the appeal as a matter
of law, and the assessor's increased assessed valuation
shall be void in its entirety, and the previous assessed
valuation shall be applied to the property in place of the
increased assessed valuation. At any hearing before the
state tax commission or a court of competent jurisdiction of
an appeal of assessment from a first class charter county or
a city not within a county, the assessor shall not advocate
nor present evidence advocating a valuation higher than that
value finally determined by the assessor or the value
determined by the board of equalization, whichever is
higher, for that assessment period.
2. The county clerk shall keep an accurate record of
the proceedings and orders of the board, and the assessor
shall correct all erroneous assessments, and the clerk shall
adjust the tax book according to the orders of such board
and the orders of the state tax commission, except that in
adding or deducting such percent to each tract or parcel of
real estate as required by such board or state tax
commission, he shall add or deduct in each case any
fractional sum of less than fifty cents, so that the value
of any separate tract shall contain no fractions of a dollar.
138.135. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the county assessor of any county of

SB 1522 14
the first classification with a population of at least nine
hundred thousand inhabitants shall not be a member of the
county board of equalization.
2. In any county of the first classification with a
population of at least nine hundred thousand inhabitants,
when there is an order of the board of equalization or the
state tax commission, including a settlement order, relating
to the assessment of property, the assessment shall remain
the same for the subsequent even-numbered year unless there
has been new construction or property improvements between
January first of the odd-numbered year and January first of
the following even-numbered year. However, in the event of
a transfer of ownership of real property on or after January
first of an even-numbered year, the new owner shall be
entitled to appeal the assessed value directly to the state
tax commission by no later than December thirty-first of the
same year, even if the prior owner appealed the value in the
previous odd-numbered year and the appeal resulted in an
order of the board of equalization or state tax commission.
In any such appeal by a new owner, the state tax commission
shall have authority to lower the assessed value for the
even-numbered year.
3. In any county of the first classification with a
population of at least nine hundred thousand inhabitants,
when a hearing is conducted by the board of equalization
pursuant to this chapter, if the property owner requests to
be heard by a majority of the board of equalization, and a
majority of the board of equalization is not in attendance
for any reason, the position of the property owner shall
prevail without further action.
138.434. In any first class charter county or a city
not within a county [may require by ordinance or charter the

SB 1522 15
reimbursement to], a taxpayer [for the amount of just and
reasonable appraisal costs, attorney fees and court costs]
shall be entitled to an award of all attorney's fees and
costs of litigation resulting from an evidentiary hearing
before the state tax commission or a court of competent
jurisdiction, including, but not limited to, attorney's
fees, appraisal costs, witness fees, and court costs,
whether paid directly by the taxpayer or paid by an
attorney, tax agent, or other third party, if such appeal
results in a final decision reducing the appraised value of
residential property by at least fifteen percent or the
appraised value of utility, industrial railroad and other
subclass three property by at least twenty-five percent from
the appraised value determined by the board of equalization
for that tax year. The commission or court awarding such
fees and costs shall consider the reasonableness of the fees
and costs within the context of the particular case. Such
fees and costs shall not exceed [one] five thousand dollars
for a residential property appeal. Such fees and costs for
utility, industrial railroad or other subclass three
property appeals shall not exceed the lesser of [four] five
thousand dollars or twenty-five percent of the tax savings
resulting from the appeal. The provisions of this section
shall only apply to the first contested year when cases are
tried on a consolidated basis.
139.031. 1. Any taxpayer may protest all or any part
of any current taxes assessed against the taxpayer, except
taxes collected by the director of revenue of Missouri. Any
such taxpayer desiring to pay any current taxes under
protest or while paying taxes based upon a disputed
assessment shall[, at the time of paying such taxes,] make
full payment of the current tax bill before the delinquency

SB 1522 16
date and file with the collector before the delinquency date
a written statement setting forth the grounds on which the
protest is based. The statement shall include the true
value in money claimed by the taxpayer if disputed. An
appeal before the state tax commission shall not be
dismissed on the grounds that a taxpayer failed to file a
written statement when paying taxes based upon a disputed
assessment.
2. Upon receiving [payment of current taxes under]
written notice of protest under subsection 1 of this section
or upon receiving from the state tax commission or the
circuit court notice of an appeal from the state tax
commission or the circuit court under section 138.430,
[along with] and full payment of the current tax bill before
the delinquency date, the collector shall disburse to the
proper official all portions of taxes not protested or not
disputed by the taxpayer and shall impound in a separate
fund all portions of such taxes which are protested or in
dispute. Every taxpayer protesting the payment of current
taxes under subsection 1 of this section shall, within
ninety days after filing his protest, commence an action
against the collector by filing a petition for the recovery
of the amount protested in the circuit court of the county
in which the collector maintains his office. If any
taxpayer so protesting his taxes under subsection 1 of this
section shall fail to commence an action in the circuit
court for the recovery of the taxes protested within the
time prescribed in this subsection, such protest shall
become null and void and of no effect, and the collector
shall then disburse to the proper official the taxes
impounded, and any interest earned thereon, as provided
above in this subsection.

SB 1522 17
3. No action against the collector shall be commenced
by any taxpayer who has, effective for the current tax year,
filed with the state tax commission or the circuit court a
timely and proper appeal of the assessment of the taxpayer's
property. The portion of taxes in dispute from an appeal of
an assessment shall be impounded in a separate fund and the
commission in its decision and order issued under chapter
138 or the circuit court in its judgment may order all or
any part of such taxes refunded to the taxpayer, or may
authorize the collector to release and disburse all or any
part of such taxes.
4. Trial of the action for recovery of taxes protested
under subsection 1 of this section in the circuit court
shall be in the manner prescribed for nonjury civil
proceedings, and, after determination of the issues, the
court shall make such orders as may be just and equitable to
refund to the taxpayer all or any part of the current taxes
paid under protest, together with any interest earned
thereon, or to authorize the collector to release and
disburse all or any part of the impounded taxes, and any
interest earned thereon, to the appropriate officials of the
taxing authorities. Either party to the proceedings may
appeal the determination of the circuit court.
5. All the county collectors of taxes, and the
collector of taxes in any city not within a county, shall,
upon written application of a taxpayer, refund or credit
against the taxpayer's tax liability in the following
taxable year and subsequent consecutive taxable years until
the taxpayer has received credit in full for any real or
personal property tax mistakenly or erroneously levied
against the taxpayer and collected in whole or in part by
the collector. Such application shall be filed within three

SB 1522 18
years after the tax is mistakenly or erroneously paid. The
governing body, or other appropriate body or official of the
county or city not within a county, shall make available to
the collector funds necessary to make refunds under this
subsection by issuing warrants upon the fund to which the
mistaken or erroneous payment has been credited, or
otherwise.
6. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on any money
paid in by the taxpayer erroneously.
7. All protested taxes impounded under protest under
subsection 1 of this section and all disputed taxes
impounded under notice as required by section 138.430 shall
be invested by the collector in the same manner as assets
specified in section 30.260 for investment of state moneys.
A taxpayer who is entitled to a refund of protested or
disputed taxes shall also receive the interest earned on the
investment thereof. If the collector is ordered to release
and disburse all or part of the taxes paid under protest or
dispute to the proper official, such taxes shall be
disbursed along with the proportional amount of interest
earned on the investment of the taxes due the particular
taxing authority.
8. Any taxing authority may request to be notified by
the county collector of current taxes paid under protest.
Such request shall be in writing and submitted on or before
February first next following the delinquent date of current
taxes paid under protest or disputed, and the county
collector shall provide such information on or before March
100 first of the same year to the requesting taxing authority of
101 the taxes paid under protest and disputed taxes which would
102 be received by such taxing authority if the funds were not
103 the subject of a protest or dispute. Any taxing authority

SB 1522 19
104 may apply to the circuit court of the county or city not
105 within a county in which a collector has impounded protested
106 or disputed taxes under this section and, upon a
107 satisfactory showing that such taxing authority would
108 receive such impounded tax funds if they were not the
109 subject of a protest or dispute and that such taxing
110 authority has the financial ability and legal capacity to
111 repay such impounded tax funds in the event a decision
112 ordering a refund to the taxpayer is subsequently made, the
113 circuit court shall order, pendente lite, the disbursal of
114 all or any part of such impounded tax funds to such taxing
115 authority. The circuit court issuing an order under this
116 subsection shall retain jurisdiction of such matter for
117 further proceedings, if any, to compel restitution of such
118 tax funds to the taxpayer. In the event that any protested
119 or disputed tax funds refunded to a taxpayer were disbursed
120 to a taxing authority under this subsection instead of being
121 held and invested by the collector under subsection 7 of
122 this section, the taxpayer shall be entitled to interest on
123 all refunded tax funds, from the date that the disputed
124 taxes were distributed to a taxing authority through the
125 date of the refund, at the [annual rate] rates calculated by
126 the state treasurer and applied by the director of revenue
127 under section 32.068. This measure of interest shall only
128 apply to protested or disputed tax funds actually
129 distributed to a taxing authority pursuant to this
130 subsection. In the event of a refund of protested or
131 disputed tax funds which remain impounded by the collector,
132 the taxpayer shall instead be entitled to the interest
133 actually earned on those refunded impounded tax funds under
134 subsection 7 of this section. Any sovereign or official
135 immunity otherwise applicable to the taxing authorities is

SB 1522 20
136 hereby waived for all purposes related to this subsection,
137 and the taxpayer is expressly authorized to seek an order
138 enforcing this provision from the circuit court that
139 originally ordered the distribution of the protested or
140 disputed funds, or directly from the state tax commission,
141 if the tax appeal that resulted in the refund was heard and
142 determined by the state tax commission.
143 9. No appeal filed from the circuit court's or state
144 tax commission's determination pertaining to the amount of
145 refund shall stay any order of refund, but the decision
146 filed by any court of last review modifying that
147 determination shall be binding on the parties, and the
148 decision rendered shall be complied with by the party
149 affected by any modification within ninety days of the date
150 of such decision. No taxpayer shall receive any interest on
151 any additional award of refund, and the collector shall not
152 receive any interest on any ordered return of refund in
153 whole or in part. In the event that a taxpayer is entitled
154 to a refund, the collector shall issue the refund to the
155 taxpayer within thirty days of the date that the circuit
156 court's or state tax commission's determination establishing
157 the amount of the refund becomes final, and if the collector
158 does not issue the refund within thirty days, the taxpayer
159 shall be entitled to interest on the refund at the rate
160 established by the director of revenue under section 32.065
161 for the period of time after the expiration of the thirty
162 days and until the refund is issued, in addition to all
163 other interest due to the taxpayer under this section.
✓